Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1906
Construction of new renewable generation facilities; electric supplier; governing body; duties.

The governing body of an electric supplier that has determined a need to construct new renewable generation facilities shall take reasonable steps to determine if one or more C-BED projects are available and are technically, economically, and operationally feasible to provide some or all of the identified generation need.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB736, § 4.